Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.650

Payments pursuant to court orders entered under prior law.

(1) Notwithstanding RCW 2.10.180(1), 2.12.090(1), * 41.26.180(1), 41.32.052(1), 41.40.052(1), and 43.43.310(1) as those sections existed between July 1, 1987, and July 28, 1991, the department of retirement systems shall make direct payments of benefits to a spouse or ex spouse pursuant to court orders or decrees entered before July 1, 1987, that complied with all the requirements in RCW 2.10.180(1), 2.12.090(2), * 41.26.180(3), 41.32.052(3), 41.40.052(3), 43.43.310(2), and ** 41.04.310 through 41.04.330, as such requirements existed before July 1, 1987. The department shall be responsible for making direct payments only if the decree or court order expressly orders the department to make direct payments to the spouse or ex spouse and specifies a sum certain or percentage amount of the benefit payments to be made to the spouse or ex spouse.

(2) The department of retirement systems shall notify a spouse or ex spouse who, pursuant to a mandatory benefits assignment order entered between July 1, 1987, and July 28, 1991, is receiving benefits in satisfaction of a court-ordered property division, that he or she is entitled to receive direct payments of a court-ordered property division pursuant to RCW 41.50.670 if the dissolution order fully complies or is modified to fully comply with the requirements of RCW 41.50.670 through 41.50.720 and, as applicable, RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, * 41.26.180, 41.32.052, 41.40.052, 43.43.310, and 26.09.138. The department shall send notice in writing as soon as reasonably feasible but no later than ninety days after July 28, 1991. The department shall also send notice to the obligor member spouse.

[ 1991 c 365 s 12; 1987 c 326 s 16.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 41.26.180 was recodified as RCW 41.26.053 pursuant to 1994 c 298 s 5.

**(2) RCW 41.04.310 through 41.04.330 were repealed by 1987 c 326 s 21, effective July 1, 1987.

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.